Missouri, session 2026, SB1780.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 407.3300, to read as
follows:
407.3300. 1. No person, company, or business shall
sell or market products using the term wood without the
product's decorative surface being made of solid wood or
wood veneer, originating from a tree. No person, company,
or business shall advertise or sell any part of a product
marketed using wood-related terms or names of wood species
including, but not limited to, oak, maple, cherry, pine, and
walnut if the product's decorative surface is not that wood
species.
2. A person, company, or business may sell any product
physically located within the state as of August 28, 2026,
that is packaged in violation of the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section if the product is clearly
labeled: "This product is not made from wood.". After
August 28, 2026, no additional products shall enter the
state if the packaging is in violation of subsection 1 of
this section.

SB 1780 2
3. The department of agriculture may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓